Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2428
Immunity.

(1) Any person or entity, including a cancer drug manufacturer, which exercises reasonable care in donating, accepting, distributing, or dispensing cancer drugs under the Cancer Drug Repository Program Act or rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act shall be immune from civil or criminal liability or professional disciplinary action of any kind for any injury, death, or loss to person or property relating to such activities.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the donation of a cancer drug by a cancer drug manufacturer does not absolve the manufacturer of any criminal or civil liability that would have existed but for the donation, nor shall such donation increase the liability of such cancer drug manufacturer that would have existed but for the donation.

Laws 2003, LB 756, § 7.